Washington statutes.
RCW 36.95.080

List of television set owners.

The board shall, on or before the first day of July of any given year, ascertain and prepare a list of all persons believed to own television sets within the district and deliver a copy of such list to the county treasurer.

[ 1988 c 222 s 1; 1981 c 52 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 155 s 8.]